Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.67.030

Employment training finance account.

(1) All payments received from a participant in the Washington customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 must be deposited into the employment training finance account, which is hereby created in the custody of the state treasurer. Only the state board for community and technical colleges may authorize expenditures from the account and no appropriation is required for expenditures. The money in the account must be used solely for training allowances under the Washington customized employment training program created in RCW 28B.67.020 and for providing up to seventy-five thousand dollars per year for training, marketing, and facilitation services to increase the use of the program. The deposit of payments under this section from a participant ceases when the board specifies that the participant has met the monetary obligations of the program. During the 2013-2015 fiscal biennium, the legislature may transfer from the employment training finance account to the state general fund such amounts as reflect the excess fund balance in the account.

(2) All revenue solicited and received under the provisions of RCW 28B.67.020(4) must be deposited into the employment training finance account to provide training allowances.

(3) The definitions in RCW 28B.67.010 apply to this section.

[ 2017 c 21 s 2; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 961; 2012 c 46 s 2; 2010 1st sp.s. c 26 s 4. Prior: 2009 c 564 s 1804; 2009 c 296 s 2; 2006 c 112 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.